Vermont statutes. Title 14A Trusts
Chapter 1. General Provisions and Definitions
§ 110.
Others treated as qualified beneficiaries.

Whenever notice to qualified beneficiaries of a trust is required under this title, the trustee shall also give notice to any other beneficiary who has sent the trustee a request for notice.

A charitable organization expressly designated to receive distributions under the terms of a charitable trust has the rights of a qualified beneficiary under this title if the charitable organization, on the date the charitable organization’s qualification is being determined, is:
(b) (1) A charitable organization expressly designated to receive distributions under the terms of a charitable trust has the rights of a qualified beneficiary under this title if the charitable organization, on the date the charitable organization’s qualification is being determined, is:

a “first tier” beneficiary as a distributee or permissible distributee of trust income or principal;

a “second tier” beneficiary who would be a first tier beneficiary of trust income or principal if the interests of the distributees described in subdivision (1)(A) of this subsection (b) terminated on that date without causing the trust to terminate; or

a “final beneficiary” who would be a distributee or permissible distributee of trust income or principal if the trust terminated on that date.

Notwithstanding subdivision (1) of this subsection (b), a second tier beneficiary or a final beneficiary whose interest in the trust is created by the exercise of a power of appointment, and the exercise of the power of appointment is not irrevocable, shall not have the rights of a “qualified beneficiary.”

A person appointed to enforce a trust created for the care of an animal or another noncharitable purpose as provided in section 408 or 409 of this title has the rights of a qualified beneficiary under this title.

The Attorney General of this State has the rights of a qualified beneficiary with respect to a charitable trust having its principal place of administration in this State.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 20

, § 1.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

Under the Uniform Trust Code, certain notices need be given only to the “qualified” beneficiaries. For the definition of “qualified beneficiary,” see Section 103(13). Among these notices are notice of a transfer of the trust’s principal place of administration (Section 108(d)), notice of a trust division or combination (Section 417), notice of a trustee resignation (Section 705(a)(1)), and notice of a trustee’s annual report (Section 813(c)). Subsection (a) of this section authorizes other beneficiaries to receive one or more of these notices by filing a request for notice with the trustee.

Under the Code, certain actions, such as the appointment of a successor trustee, can be accomplished by the consent of the qualified beneficiaries.
See, e.g.
, Section 704 (filling vacancy in trusteeship). Subsection (a) only addresses notice, not required consent. A person who requests notice under subsection (a) does not thereby acquire a right to participate in actions that can be taken only upon consent of the qualified beneficiaries.

Charitable trusts do not have beneficiaries in the usual sense. However, certain persons, while not technically beneficiaries, do have an interest in seeing that the trust is enforced. In the case of a charitable trust, this includes the state’s attorney general and charitable organizations expressly designated to receive distributions under the terms of the trust, Under subsection (b), charitable organizations expressly designated in the terms of the trust to receive distributions and who would qualify as a qualified beneficiary were the trust noncharitable, are granted the rights of qualified beneficiaries under the Code. Because the charitable organization must be expressly named in the terms of the trust and must be designated to receive distributions, excluded are organizations that might receive distributions in the trustee’s discretion but that are not named in the trust’s terms. Requiring that the organization have an interest similar to that of a beneficiary of a private trust also denies the rights of a qualified beneficiary to organizations holding remote remainder interests. For further discussion of the definition of “qualified beneficiary,” see Section 103 comment.

Subsection (c) similarly grants the rights of qualified beneficiaries to persons appointed by the terms of the trust or by the court to enforce a trust created for an animal or other trust with a valid purpose but no ascertainable beneficiary. For the requirements for creating such trusts, see Sections 408 and 409.

“Attorney general” is placed in brackets in subsection (d) to accommodate jurisdictions which grant enforcement authority over charitable trusts to another designated official.

Because states take various approaches to enforcement of charitable trusts, by a 2004 amendment subsection (d) was placed in brackets in its entirety. For a discussion, see 2004 Amendment below.

Subsection (d) does not limit other means by which the attorney general or other designated official can enforce a charitable trust.

§ 111.
Nonjudicial settlement agreements.

For purposes of this section, “interested persons” means persons whose consent would be required in order to achieve a binding settlement were the settlement to be approved by the Probate Division of the Superior Court.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) of this section, interested persons may enter into a binding nonjudicial settlement agreement with respect to any matter involving a trust.

A nonjudicial settlement agreement is valid only to the extent it does not violate a material purpose of the trust and includes terms and conditions that could be properly approved by the Probate Division of the Superior Court under this title or other applicable law.

Matters that may be resolved by a nonjudicial settlement agreement include:

the interpretation or construction of the terms of the trust;

the approval of a trustee’s report or accounting;

direction to a trustee to perform or to refrain from performing a particular act or the grant to a trustee of any necessary or desirable power;

the resignation or appointment of a trustee and the determination of a trustee’s compensation;

transfer of a trust’s principal place of administration; and

liability of a trustee for an action relating to the trust.

Any interested person may request the Probate Division of the Superior Court to approve a nonjudicial settlement agreement to determine whether the representation as provided in chapter 3 of this title was adequate, and to determine whether the agreement contains terms and conditions the Probate Division of the Superior Court could have properly approved.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 20

, § 1; amended

2009, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 236, eff. Feb. 1, 2011.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

While the Uniform Trust Code recognizes that a court may intervene in the administration of a trust to the extent its jurisdiction is invoked by interested persons or otherwise provided by law (
see
Section 201(a)), resolution of disputes by nonjudicial means is encouraged. This section facilitates the making of such agreements by giving them the same effect as if approved by the court. To achieve such certainty, however, subsection (c) requires that the nonjudicial settlement must contain terms and conditions that a court could properly approve. Under this section, a nonjudicial settlement cannot be used to produce a result not authorized by law, such as to terminate a trust in an impermissible manner.

Trusts ordinarily have beneficiaries who are minors, incapacitated, unborn or unascertained. Because such beneficiaries cannot signify their consent to an agreement, binding settlements can ordinarily be achieved only through the application of doctrines such as virtual representation or appointment of a guardian ad litem, doctrines traditionally available only in the case of judicial settlements. The effect of this section and the Uniform Trust Code more generally is to allow for such binding representation even if the agreement is not submitted for approval to a court. For the rules on representation, including appointments of representatives by the court to approve particular settlements, see Article 3.

Subsection (d) is a nonexclusive list of matters to which a nonjudicial settlement may pertain. Other matters which may be made the subject of a nonjudicial settlement are listed in the Article 3 General Comment. The fact that the trustee and beneficiaries may resolve a matter nonjudicially does not mean that beneficiary approval is required. For example, a trustee may resign pursuant to Section 705 solely by giving notice to the qualified beneficiaries and any cotrustees. But a nonjudicial settlement between the trustee and beneficiaries will frequently prove helpful in working out the terms of the resignation.

Because of the great variety of matters to which a nonjudicial settlement may be applied, this section does not attempt to precisely define the “interested persons” whose consent is required to obtain a binding settlement as provided in subsection (a). However, the consent of the trustee would ordinarily be required to obtain a binding settlement with respect to matters involving a trustee’s administration, such as approval of a trustee’s report or resignation.

§ 112.
Rules of construction.

The rules of construction that apply in this State to the interpretation of and disposition of property by will also apply as appropriate to the interpretation of the terms of a trust and the disposition of the trust property.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 20

, § 1.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

This section is patterned after Restatement (Third) of Trusts § 25(2) and comment e (Tentative Draft No. 1, approved 1996), although this section, unlike the Restatement, also applies to irrevocable trusts. The revocable trust is used primarily as a will substitute, with its key provision being the determination of the persons to receive the trust property upon the settlor’s death. Given this functional equivalence between the revocable trust and a will, the rules for interpreting the disposition of property at death should be the same whether the individual has chosen a will or revocable trust as the individual’s primary estate planning instrument. Over the years, the legislatures of the States and the courts have developed a series of rules of construction reflecting the legislative or judicial understanding of how the average testator would wish to dispose of property in cases where the will is silent or insufficiently clear. Few legislatures have yet to extend these rules of construction to revocable trusts, and even fewer to irrevocable trusts, although a number of courts have done so as a matter of judicial construction.
See
Restatement (Third) of Trusts § 25, Reporter’s Notes to cmt. d and e (Tentative Draft No. 1, approved 1996).

Because of the wide variation among the States on the rules of construction applicable to wills, this Code does not attempt to prescribe the exact rules to be applied to trusts but instead adopts the philosophy of the Restatement that the rules applicable to trusts ought to be the same, whatever those rules might be.

Rules of construction are not the same as constructional preferences. A constructional preference is general in nature, providing general guidance for resolving a wide variety of ambiguities. An example is a preference for a construction that results in a complete disposition and avoid illegality. Rules of construction, on the other hand, are specific in nature, providing guidance for resolving specific situations or construing specific terms. Unlike a constructional preference, a rule of construction, when applicable, can lead to only one result.
See
Restatement (Third) of Property: Donative Transfers § 11.3 and comment b (Tentative Draft No. 1, approved 1995).

Rules of construction attribute intention to individual donors based on assumptions of common intention. Rules of construction are found both in enacted statutes and in judicial decisions. Rules of construction can involve the meaning to be given to particular language in the document, such as the meaning to be given to “heirs” or “issue.” Rules of construction also address situations the donor failed to anticipate. These include the failure to anticipate the predecease of a beneficiary or to specify the source from which expenses are to be paid. Rules of construction can also concern assumptions as to how a donor would have revised donative documents in light of certain events occurring after execution. These include rules dealing with the effect of a divorce and whether a specific devisee will receive a substitute gift if the subject matter of the devise is disposed of during the testator’s lifetime.

Instead of enacting this section, a jurisdiction enacting this Code may wish to enact detailed rules on the construction of trusts, either in addition to its rules on the construction of wills or as part of one comprehensive statute applicable to both wills and trusts. For this reason and to encourage this alternative, the section has been made optional. For possible models, see Uniform Probate Code, Article 2, Parts 7 and 8, which was added to the UPC in 1990, and California Probate Code §§ 21101-21630, enacted in 1994.